Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.090

Judgment—Decree of appropriation—Recording.

At the time of rendering judgment for damages, whether upon default or trial, if the damages awarded be then paid, or upon their payment, if not paid at the time of rendering such judgment, the court or judge thereof shall also enter a judgment or decree of appropriation of the land, real estate, premises, right-of-way or other property sought to be appropriated, thereby vesting the legal title to the same in the corporation seeking to appropriate such land, real estate, premises, right-of-way or other property for corporate purposes. Whenever said judgment or decree of appropriation shall affect lands, real estate or other premises, a certified copy of such judgment or decree of appropriation may be filed for record in the office of the auditor of the county where the said land, real estate or other premises are situated, and shall be recorded by said auditor like a deed of real estate and with like effect. If the title to said land, real estate, premises or other property attempted to be acquired is found to be defective from any cause, the corporation may again institute proceedings to acquire the same, as in RCW 8.20.010 through 8.20.140 provided.

[ 1891 c 46 s 1; 1890 p 298 s 6; RRS s 927.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 54, 58.

Recording of deeds of real estate: Title 65 RCW.